Utah statutes.
58-64-701.   State preemption of local regulation.

(1)  A political subdivision of this state may not enact any legislation, code, or ordinance, or make any rules relating to the licensing, training, or regulation of deception detection examiners or interns.

(2)  Any legislation, code, ordinance, or rules made by any political subdivision of this state, relating to the licensing, training, or regulation of deception detection examiners or interns is superseded by this chapter.

